California, session 20252026, SB1281.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17000 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:17000. For purposes of this division, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Certified community conservation corps” means a community conservation corps that was in existence on on, or that is formed subsequent to, September 30, 1999, or that is formed subsequent to that date, and that is designated by a city or a city and county to perform litter abatement, recycling, and related activities, if the city or the city and county has a population, as determined by the most recent census, of more than 250,000 persons.(b) “Community conservation corps” means a community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5, that is designated by a county to perform litter abatement, recycling, and related activities, and that is certified by the California Conservation Corps as having operated for a minimum of two years and as meeting all other criteria of Section 14507.5.(c) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.